Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-8,138
Contestants; compensation; when payable; fake contests.

No contestant in any match or exhibition shall be paid for services until the same are rendered, and should it be determined by the State Athletic Commissioner that a contestant did not give an honest exhibition of his or her skill, he or she shall not be paid. Any contestant who shall participate in any sham or fake professional boxing, professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional kickboxing, professional bare-knuckle boxing, amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing match or exhibition shall be disqualified and shall not thereafter be permitted to contend in any match or exhibition in this state, and any contestant who shall participate in any sham or fake professional boxing, professional mixed martial arts, professional bare-knuckle mixed martial arts, professional mixed martial arts on ice, professional muay thai, professional kickboxing, professional bare-knuckle boxing, amateur mixed martial arts, amateur muay thai, or amateur kickboxing match or exhibition shall be guilty of a violation of sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01.

Laws 1957, c. 382, § 11, p. 1330;

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 12;

Laws 2007, LB471, § 8;

Laws 2012, LB869, § 9;

Laws 2021, LB70, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB635, § 9.